Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
85-2407
Act; exemptions.

The following
are exempt from the Postsecondary Institution Act:

(1) Any institution
or organization which offers education or instruction and which is licensed
and regulated solely by an agency of the federal government with respect to
curriculum and qualifications of instructional staff; or

(2) Any private
postsecondary career school as defined in the Private Postsecondary Career
School Act.

Laws 2011, LB637, § 7.

Private Postsecondary Career School Act, see section 85-1601.